Vermont, session 2025-2026, H144.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. FINDINGS
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) approximately 26 million adults and six million children in the
United States have a food allergy that could be life-threatening, including,
statistically, several thousands of whom are Vermonters;
VT LEG #379034 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.144
2025 Page 2 of 5
(2) 38 percent of food allergic adults have reported at least one food-
allergy-related emergency department visit in their lifetime;
(3) approximately 30,000 hospital visits are attributed to food allergies
each year in the United States; and
(4) according to the U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention,
food allergies cause between 150 and 200 deaths annually and nearly half the
fatal allergy reactions over a 13-year period were caused by food prepared at a
restaurant or other food service establishment.
Sec. 2. 18 V.S.A. § 4301 is amended to read:
§ 4301. DEFINITIONS
(a) As used in this chapter:
* * *
(15) “Major food allergen” means any of the following:
(A) milk, egg, fish, crustacean shellfish, tree nuts, wheat, peanuts,
sesame, and soybeans; or
(B) a food ingredient that contains protein derived from a food
specified in subdivision (A) of this subdivision (15), except any highly refined
oil derived from a food specified in subdivision (A) or any ingredient derived
from a highly refined oil derived from a food specified in subdivision (A).
* * *
VT LEG #379034 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.144
2025 Page 3 of 5
Sec. 3. 18 V.S.A. § 4310 is added to read:
§ 4310. FOOD ALLERGEN AWARENESS TRAINING
(a) The Commissioner shall designate one or more online food allergen
training programs for employees of food service establishments. Designated
programs shall be posted on the Department’s website and shall comply with
the Office of Racial Equity’s most recent Language Access Report.
(b)(1) The owner or operator of a food service establishment that offers
seating for on-site food consumption shall designate one or more public-facing
employees and one or more employees involved in food preparation to serve as
food safety officers while on duty at the food service establishment. A public-
facing food safety officer and food safety officer involved in food preparation
shall be present at a food service establishment during hours of operation.
(2) The owner or operator of a food service establishment that does not
offer seating for on-site food consumption shall designate one or more
employees to serve as food safety officers while on duty at the food service
establishment. A food safety officer shall be present at the food service
establishment during hours of operation.
(c)(1) A food safety officer shall complete a designated food allergen
training program at intervals determined by the Commissioner in rule.
VT LEG #379034 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.144
2025 Page 4 of 5
(2) The owner or operator of a food service establishment shall assume
responsibility for costs related to completing a food allergen training program
by any food safety officers it employs.
(d) Upon completion of a food allergen training program, the food safety
officer shall provide the owner or operator of the food service establishment
with a written certificate acknowledging successful completion of the program.
The certificate shall be kept on file at the food service establishment and shall
be available for inspection by the Department upon request.
Sec. 4. 18 V.S.A. § 4311 is added to read:
§ 4311. FOOD ALLERGEN SIGNAGE
(a)(1) The owner or operator of a food service establishment licensed
pursuant to section 4351 of this title shall conspicuously post food allergen
signage in the public-facing section of a food service establishment and where
food is prepared. The signage shall:
(A) list the major food allergens;
(B) indicate how many food safety officers are located on the
premise;
(C) direct customers to advise a food service establishment employee
of a known food allergy or special dietary requirement;
(D) list actions to be taken by the food service establishment if a
customer informs a food service establishment employee of a food allergy;
VT LEG #379034 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.144
2025 Page 5 of 5
(E) identify symptoms of an allergic reaction, including loss of
consciousness; shortness of breath; itching or tingling in or around the mouth,
face, scalp, hands, and feet; hives; swelling of the face, eyelids, tongue, lips,
hands, or feet; tightening of the throat; and sudden onset of vomiting, cramps,
or diarrhea;
(F) identify actions to be taken if a customer has an allergic reaction;
and
(G) any other information related to food allergens that the
Commissioner directs by rule.
(2) A food service establishment may develop and post its own signage
in compliance with this subsection or obtain and post signage developed by the
Department.
(3) All signage developed in accordance with this subsection shall
comply with the Office of Racial Equity’s most recent Language Access
Report.
(b) The owner or operator of a food service establishment licensed pursuant
to section 4351 of this title shall include in all electronic and printed menus a
request that customers advise a food service establishment employee of a
known food allergy.
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379034 v.1